Hawaii statutes.
§501-138 Discharge or modification of liens
to be recorded. Attachments on mesne process and liens of every
description upon registered land shall be continued, reduced, discharged, and
dissolved by any method sufficient in law to continue, reduce, discharge, or
dissolve like liens on unregistered land. All certificates or other
instruments which are permitted or required by law to be recorded in the bureau
of conveyances to give effect to the continuance, reduction, discharge, or
dissolution of attachments or other liens upon unregistered lands, or to give
notice of such continuance, reduction, discharge, or dissolution, shall in the
case of like liens upon registered land be filed and registered with the
assistant registrar. [L 1903, c 56, §73; RL 1925, §3262; RL 1935, §5071; RL
1945, §12671; RL 1955, §342-71; HRS §501-138]

Rules of Court

Discharge or modification of liens, see RLC rule 63.

Case Notes

Removing of encumbrance. 32 H. 680.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next